New York, session 2025-2026, S3548.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 1351 of the real property actions 2 and proceedings law, as amended by chapter 269 of the laws of 2020, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. The judgment shall direct that the mortgaged premises, or so much 5 thereof as may be sufficient to discharge the mortgage debt, the 6 expenses of the sale and the costs of the action, and which may be sold 7 separately without material injury to the parties interested, be sold by 8 or under the direction of the sheriff of the county, or a referee within 9 [ninety] forty-five days of the date of the judgment. The judgment shall 10 also include the name and telephone number of the mortgage servicer for 11 a plaintiff involving a mortgage foreclosure of a one- to four-family 12 residential property. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 14 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08087-01-5